Vermont, session 2025-2026, S317.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) In addition to the weatherization efforts provided under the current
Home Weatherization Assistance Program established in 33 V.S.A. chapter 25,
an increased pace of weatherization would benefit the health of Vermont
VT LEG #385493 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.317
2026 Page 2 of 5
citizens, the environment, and the economy. Accelerated weatherization
efforts will:
(A) provide fuel cost savings and savings for the Low Income Home
Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) and the Home Heating Fuel Assistance
Program; and
(B) increase job opportunities in the field of weatherization and
alternative heating systems by recruiting and training new applicants to the
industry.
(2) Weatherization is a means for homeowners to protect the
environment and diminish the outflow of money to the fossil fuel industry.
(3) Workforce availability remains a limiting factor in Vermont’s effort
to comply with required reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from the
building sector. Increasing wages while aggressively recruiting and training
new applicants can eventually help to overcome the workforce shortage.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 2502 is amended to read:
§ 2502. HOME WEATHERIZATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
* * *
(b) In addition, the Director shall supplement or supplant any federal
program with the State Home Weatherization Assistance Program.
* * *
VT LEG #385493 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.317
2026 Page 3 of 5
(3) The Director, in collaboration with the weatherization service
providers and other stakeholders, shall develop the State program so that it will
include:
* * *
(C) Establishing Program eligibility levels at 80 125 percent of the
area median income or 80 125 percent of the State median income, whichever
is higher. Subject to the priority under section 2608 of this title given to
participants in the Home Heating Fuel Assistance Program, the State program
shall, when weighing factors to assign priority to buildings or units eligible for
weatherization assistance, assign the greatest weight to those buildings and
units that require the highest energy usage.
* * *
(H) Collaborating with and, if necessary, contributing funds and
administrative support to local workforce and education partnerships, including
the Department of Economic Development Vermont Training Program, the
Department of Labor, the Vermont Energy Investment Corporation,
ReSOURCE’s Weatherization 101 training program, organizations
representing the interests of Vermont’s homeless population, recently
completed substance abuse rehabilitation clients, and high school career and
technical education programs.
VT LEG #385493 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.317
2026 Page 4 of 5
(I) Administering salary increases to the installation crew and
technical staff of the Home Weatherization Assistance Program as follows: 15
percent beginning in fiscal year 2026, 15 percent beginning in fiscal year 2027,
and 15 percent beginning in fiscal year 2028.
(J) Establishing a partnership with the energy efficiency utilities to
provide free weatherization services to eligible households with income less
than 125 percent of the county or State median income, whichever is greater.
The participating energy efficiency utilities shall comply with the salary
increases in subdivision (I) of this subdivision (b)(3). The Director shall
reimburse the utilities from funds in the Home Weatherization Assistance
Fund, provided that reimbursement is made within a limit of 10 percent of the
Fund.
* * *
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 2503 is amended to read:
§ 2503. FUEL TAX
(a)(1) There is imposed a tax on the retail sale of heating oil, propane,
kerosene, and other dyed diesel fuel delivered in Vermont, at the rate of $0.02
per gallon, until June 30, 2027.
(2) There is imposed a gross receipts tax of 0.75 percent on the retail
sale of natural gas and coal.
VT LEG #385493 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.317
2026 Page 5 of 5
(3) There is imposed a gross receipts tax of 0.5 percent on the retail sale
of electricity.
* * *
(d) No tax under this section shall be imposed for any month ending after
June 30, 2029.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385493 v.1